District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.114

Repealed

Funding for civil legal services.

Repealed.

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 3032, 54 DCR 7052
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 3013, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3032 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3013 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
Short title: Section 3031 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle D of title III of the act may be cited as the “Civil Legal Services Amendment Act of 2007”.